Illinois, session 104th, SB1907.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Access 5to Prescription Drugs Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Department" means any State agency.8    "Eligible prescription drug" means a prescription drug 9that is not under patent or a biological product, as defined in 1042 U.S.C. 262(i), that is not under patent.11    "Generic prescription drug" means a drug that is approved 12pursuant to an application referencing an eligible 13prescription drug that is submitted under subsection (j) of 14Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 15U.S.C. 355(j)) or under subsection (k) of Section 351 of the 16federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 262(k)).17    "Partnerships" includes, but is not limited to, agreements 18for the procurement of generic prescription drugs by way of 19contracts or purchasing by a payor, State governmental agency, 20group purchasing organization, nonprofit organization, or 21other entity.22    "Provider" means a hospital licensed under the Hospital 23Licensing Act or organized under the University of Illinois   SB1907- 2 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1Hospital Act, a skilled nursing facility as that term is 2defined under Section 2 of the Comprehensive Health Insurance 3Plan Act, a comprehensive outpatient rehabilitation facility, 4a home health agency as that term is defined under Section 2.04 5of the Home Health, Home Services, and Home Nursing Agency 6Licensing Act, a hospice as that term is defined under Section 72 of the Comprehensive Health Insurance Plan Act, a public 8health clinic as that term is defined under Section 6-101 of 9the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees Tort 10Immunity Act, or a rehabilitation agency.11    "Supplier" means a physician, surgeon, or other health 12care practitioner or an entity other than a provider that 13furnishes health care services. 14    Section 10. Cost of prescription drugs; partnerships.15    (a) A department may enter into partnerships consistent 16with subsection (b) of Section 15, in consultation with other 17State agencies as necessary, to increase competition, lower 18prices, and address shortages in the market for generic 19prescription drugs, reduce the cost of generic prescription 20drugs for public and private purchasers, taxpayers, and 21consumers, and increase patient access to affordable generic 22prescription drugs.23    (b) Subject to appropriation by the General Assembly for 24this purpose, the department may hire staff to oversee and 25project-manage the partnerships for manufacturing or   SB1907- 3 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1distribution of generic prescription drugs.  2    Section 15. Generic prescription drug prices.3    (a) A department may enter into partnerships resulting in 4the production or distribution of generic prescription drugs 5with the intent that these generic prescription drugs be made 6widely available to public and private purchasers, providers 7and suppliers, and pharmacies licensed under the Pharmacy 8Practice Act, as appropriate. The generic prescription drugs 9shall be produced or distributed by a drug company or generic 10prescription drug manufacturer that is registered with the 11United States Food and Drug Administration.12    (b) A department shall comply with the following 13requirements when entering into partnerships or setting prices 14for generic prescription drugs: 15        (1) A department shall only enter into partnerships 16    under subsection (a) to produce a generic prescription 17    drug at a price that results in savings, target failures 18    in the market for generic prescription drugs, and improve 19    patient access to affordable medications.20        (2) For generic prescription drugs prioritized in 21    accordance with the criteria listed in paragraph (5), the 22    department shall determine if viable pathways exist for 23    partnerships to manufacture or distribute generic 24    prescription drugs by examining the relevant legal, 25    market, policy, and regulatory factors.  SB1907- 4 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1        (3) A department shall consider the following, if 2    applicable, when setting the price of a generic 3    prescription drug under this Section: 4            (A) United States Food and Drug Administration 5        user fees.6            (B) Abbreviated new drug application acquisition 7        costs, amortized over a 5-year period.8            (C) Mandatory rebates.9            (D) Total contracting and production costs for the 10        generic prescription drug, including a reasonable 11        amount for administrative, operating, and 12        rate-of-return expenses of the drug company or generic 13        prescription drug manufacturer.14            (E) Research and development costs attributed to 15        the generic prescription drug over a 5-year period.16            (F) Other initial start-up costs, amortized over a 17        5-year period. 18        (4) Each generic prescription drug shall be made 19    available to providers, patients, and purchasers at a 20    transparent price and without rebates, other than 21    federally required rebates.22        (5) A department shall prioritize the selection of 23    generic prescription drugs that have the greatest impact 24    on lowering drug costs to patients, increasing competition 25    and addressing shortages in the prescription drug market, 26    improving public health, or reducing the cost of   SB1907- 5 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1    prescription drugs to public and private purchasers.2    (c) In identifying generic prescription drugs to be 3produced, a department shall consider pharmacy spending data 4from Medicaid and other entities for which the State pays the 5cost of generic prescription drugs.6    The partnerships entered into under subsection (a) shall 7include the production of at least one form of insulin, if a 8viable pathway for manufacturing a more affordable form of 9insulin exists.10    A department shall prioritize generic prescription drugs 11for chronic and high-cost conditions and shall consider 12prioritizing those that can be delivered through mail order.13    (d) A department shall consult with all of the following 14public and private purchasers to assist in developing a list 15of generic prescription drugs to be manufactured or 16distributed through partnerships and to determine the volume 17of each generic prescription drug that can be procured over a 18multiyear period to support a market for a lower-cost generic 19prescription drug:20        (1) Any public agency that is a purchaser.21        (2) Health insurers holding a valid outstanding 22    certificate of authority from the Director of Insurance.23        (3) Hospitals.24        (4) Pharmacy benefit managers. 25    (e) Before entering into a partnership under subsection 26(a), a department shall determine minimum thresholds for   SB1907- 6 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1procurement of an entity's expected volume of a targeted 2generic prescription drug from the company or manufacturer 3over a multiyear period.4    (f) The entities listed in paragraphs (2) through (5) of 5subsection (d) shall not be required to purchase prescription 6drugs from the department or from entities that contract or 7partner with the department under this Act.8    (g) A department is not required to consult with every 9entity listed in paragraphs (2) through (5) of subsection (d) 10so long as purchaser engagement includes a reasonable 11representation from those groups. 12    Section 20. Feasibility report.13    (a) On or before July 1, 2027, any department that elects 14to enter into a partnership under this Act shall submit a 15report to the General Assembly that assesses the feasibility 16of the department directly manufacturing generic prescription 17drugs and selling generic prescription drugs at a fair price. 18The report shall include an analysis of governance structure 19options for manufacturing functions, including chartering a 20private organization, public-private partnership, or public 21board of directors.22    (b) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2029.  23    Section 25. Status and analysis report.24    (a) On or before July 1, 2026, any department that elects   SB1907- 7 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1to enter into a partnership under this Act shall submit a 2report to the General Assembly with:3        (1) a description of the status of all drugs targeted 4    under this Act; and5        (2) an analysis of how the activities of the 6    department may impact competition, access to targeted 7    drugs, the costs of those drugs, and the costs of generic 8    prescription drugs for public and private purchasers.9    (b) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2030. 10    Section 30. Nonpublic information; disclosure. 11Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all nonpublic 12information and documents obtained under this Act shall not be 13required to be disclosed under the Freedom of Information Act. 14    Section 35. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 15changing Section 7.5 as follows: 16    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)17    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 18by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 19exempt from inspection and copying:20        (a) All information determined to be confidential 21    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 22    Development Act.23        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying   SB1907- 8 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1    library users with specific materials under the Library 2    Records Confidentiality Act.3        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 4    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 5    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 6    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 7    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 8    has received.9        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 10    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 11    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 12    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 13    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 14    Infection Control Act.15        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 16    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.17        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 18    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 19    Qualifications Based Selection Act.20        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 21    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 22    Tuition Act.23        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 24    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 25    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 26    general's office that would be exempt if created or   SB1907- 9 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 2    that Act.3        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 4    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 5    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 6    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.7        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 8    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 9    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.10        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 11    or driver identification information compiled by a law 12    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 13    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.14        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 15    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 16    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 17    Prevention Review Team Act.18        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 19    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 20    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 21    authorized under that Article.22        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 23    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 24    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 25    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 26    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the   SB1907- 10 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 2    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.3        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 4    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 5    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.6        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 7    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 8    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 9    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 10    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 11    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 12    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 13    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 14    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 15    Act (repealed). 16        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 17    Personnel Record Review Act. 18        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 19    Illinois School Student Records Act. 20        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 21    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 22        (t) (Blank). 23        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 24    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 25    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 26        (v) Names and information of people who have applied   SB1907- 11 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 2    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 3    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 4    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 5    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 6    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 7    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 8    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 9    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 10        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 11    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 12    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.13        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 14    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 15    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.16        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 17    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 18    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 19        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 20    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 21    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 22    information about the identity and administrative finding 23    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 24    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 25    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 26    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act.   SB1907- 12 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 2    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 3    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 4    Act. 5        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 6    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 7        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 8    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 9        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 10    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 11    authorized under that Act.12        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 13    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 14    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 15        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 16    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 17        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 18    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 19        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 20    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 21    Code. 22        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 23    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 24        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 25    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 26    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.   SB1907- 13 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 2    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 3    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 4    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 5    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 6        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 7    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 8        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 9    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 10    Aid Code. 11        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 12    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 13        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 15        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 16    arising out of a peer support counseling session 17    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 18    Suicide Prevention Act. 19        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 20    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 21    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 22    Prevention Act. 23        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 24    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 25    under the Reproductive Health Act. 26        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   SB1907- 14 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 2        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 3    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 4    Human Rights Act.5        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 6    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 7    Act. 8        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 9    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 10        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 12    Public Aid Code. 13        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 15        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 16    information that shall not be made public under the 17    Illinois Insurance Code. 18        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 19    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.20        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 21    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 22        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 24        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 25    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 26    Police Act.   SB1907- 15 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 2    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 3    Administrative Code of Illinois. 4        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 5    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 6    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 7    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 8        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 10    Violence Fatality Review Act. 11        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 12    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 13    July 1, 2025. 14        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 15    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 16    Agency Licensing Act. 17        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 18    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 19    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 20    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 21    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 22    Act. 23        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 24    the School Safety Drill Act. 25        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 26    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law.   SB1907- 16 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 2    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 3    Act. 4        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 5    2-3.196 of the School Code. 6        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 7    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 8    Power Agency Act. 9        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 10    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 11    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 12        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 13    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 14    Act. 15        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 16    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 17    Act. 18        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 19    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 20        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 21    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 22    Transmission Modernization Act. 23        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 24    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.25        (ttt) Information prohibited from being disclosed 26    under Section 30 of the Affordable Drug Manufacturing Act.   SB1907- 17 -LRB104 10724 BDA 20803 b1(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 2102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 38-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 4102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 56-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 6eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 7103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 87-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 9eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 10103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 11    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 12severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142025.